Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 1 General Provisions

Law reviews. —

For note on easements of necessity to reach public lands, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 51 (1958).

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Lands § 1 et seq.

73A C.J.S. Public Lands § 1 et seq.